Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF190.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 256.7, subsection 21, paragraph b, subparagraph (2), unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: For the school year beginning July 1, 2018, and each succeeding school year, the The rules shall also require all of the following: House File 190, p. 2 Sec. 2. Section 256.7, subsection 21, paragraph b, subparagraph (2), Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph division: NEW SUBPARAGRAPH DIVISION . (e) That any school district, accredited nonpublic school, or charter school providing instruction delivered primarily over the internet pursuant to subsection 32 may administer any state assessment required pursuant to this subsection in an online setting that is similar to the studentâs regular academic instruction, if all of the following conditions are satisfied: (i) The student takes the assessment at a date and time that are assigned by personnel designated by the school district, accredited nonpublic school, or charter school. (ii) The student participates in a synchronous assessment session that is initiated and managed by personnel designated by the school district, accredited nonpublic school, or charter school. (iii) (A) The student takes the assessment using a device and an assessment platform that allow an assessment proctor to monitor the student for the duration of the assessment through a video feed that allows the assessment proctor to view the student taking the assessment and the studentâs background. (B) If the device or assessment platform does not allow an assessment proctor to monitor the student for the duration of the assessment through a video feed in accordance with subparagraph part (A), the requirements of this subparagraph subdivision shall be satisfied if an assessment proctor is able to, through the use of a second device, monitor the student for the duration of the assessment through a video feed that allows the assessment proctor to view the student taking the assessment and the studentâs background. (iv) The school district, accredited nonpublic school, or charter school maintains a ratio of students taking the assessment to assessment proctors of not greater than ten to one. (v) The student does not exit the assessment session until instructed to do so by the assessment proctor. (vi) An assessment administrator employed or designated by House File 190, p. 3 the school district, accredited nonpublic school, or charter school verifies student submission of the assessment. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 190, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor